test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-simplex_gt-norm.yaml
     ise+Pron+Pl+Tra: [enesteks, endiks]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Trm: [enesteni, endini]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Ess: [enestena, endina]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Abe: [enesteta, endita]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Com: [enestega, endiga]
     #
     üks+Pron+Sg+Nom: üks
     üks+Pron+Sg+Gen: ühe
     üks+Pron+Sg+Par: [ühte, üht]
     üks+Pron+Sg+Ill: [ühte, ühesse]
     üks+Pron+Sg+Ine: ühes
     üks+Pron+Sg+Ela: ühest
     üks+Pron+Sg+All: ühele
     üks+Pron+Sg+Ade: ühel
     üks+Pron+Sg+Abl: ühelt
     üks+Pron+Sg+Tra: üheks
     üks+Pron+Sg+Trm: üheni
     üks+Pron+Sg+Ess: ühena
     üks+Pron+Sg+Abe: üheta
     üks+Pron+Sg+Com: ühega
     üks+Pron+Pl+Nom: ühed
     üks+Pron+Pl+Gen: ühtede
     üks+Pron+Pl+Par: ühtesid
     üks+Pron+Pl+Ill: ühtedesse
     üks+Pron+Pl+Ine: ühtedes
     üks+Pron+Pl+Ela: ühtedest
     üks+Pron+Pl+All: ühtedele
     üks+Pron+Pl+Ade: ühtedel
     üks+Pron+Pl+Abl: ühtedelt
     üks+Pron+Pl+Tra: ühtedeks
     üks+Pron+Pl+Trm: ühtedeni
     üks+Pron+Pl+Ess: ühtedena
     üks+Pron+Pl+Abe: ühtedeta
     üks+Pron+Pl+Com: ühtedega
     #
